Illinois, session 104th, SB2496.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and by adding Section 4.41 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.41 new)2    Sec. 4.41. Act repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Act is repealed on January 1, 2031:4    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.  5    Section 10. The Illinois Physical Therapy Act is amended 6by changing Sections 0.05, 1, 1.2, 1.5, 2, 3, 4, 6, 8, 8.1, 78.5, 11, 12, 15, 16, 16.1, 17, 18, 19, 19.5, 22, 23, 24, 25, 826, 29, 31, and 36 and by adding Sections 1.1 and 25.5 as 9follows: 10    (225 ILCS 90/0.05)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 0.05. Legislative Intent. This Act is enacted for the 13purpose of protecting the public health, safety, and welfare, 14and for providing for State administrative control, 15supervision, licensure, and regulation of the practice of 16physical therapy. It is the legislature's intent that only 17individuals who meet and maintain prescribed standards of 18competence and conduct may engage in the practice of physical 19therapy as authorized by this Act. This Act shall be liberally 20construed to promote the public interest and to accomplish the 21purpose stated herein. This Act does not prohibit a person 22licensed under any other Act in this State from engaging in the 23practice for which that person he or she is licensed or from 24delegating services as provided for under that other Act.  SB2496 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1(Source: P.A. 92-350, eff. 8-15-01.) 2    (225 ILCS 90/1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4251)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act:5    (1) "Physical therapy" means all of the following:6        (A) Examining, evaluating, and testing individuals who 7    may have mechanical, physiological, or developmental 8    impairments, functional limitations, disabilities, or 9    other health and movement-related conditions, classifying 10    these disorders, determining a rehabilitation prognosis 11    and plan of therapeutic intervention, and assessing the 12    ongoing effects of the interventions.13        (B) Alleviating impairments, functional limitations, 14    or disabilities by designing, implementing, and modifying 15    therapeutic interventions that may include, but are not 16    limited to, the evaluation or treatment of a patient 17    person through the use of the effective properties of 18    physical measures and heat, cold, light, water, radiant 19    energy, electricity, sound, and air and use of therapeutic 20    massage, therapeutic exercise, mobilization, dry needling, 21    and rehabilitative procedures, with or without assistive 22    devices and equipment, for the purposes of preventing, 23    correcting, or alleviating a physical or mental 24    impairment, functional limitation, or disability.25        (C) Reducing the risk of injury, impairment,   SB2496 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    functional limitation, or disability, including the 2    promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and 3    wellness.4        (D) Engaging in administration, consultation, 5    education, and research. 6    "Physical therapy" includes, but is not limited to: (a) 7performance of specialized tests and measurements, (b) 8administration of specialized treatment procedures, (c) 9interpretation of referrals from physicians, dentists, 10advanced practice registered nurses, physician assistants, and 11podiatric physicians, (d) establishment, and modification of 12physical therapy treatment programs, (e) administration of 13topical medication used in generally accepted physical therapy 14procedures when such medication is either prescribed by the 15patient's physician, licensed to practice medicine in all its 16branches, the patient's physician licensed to practice 17podiatric medicine, the patient's advanced practice registered 18nurse, the patient's physician assistant, or the patient's 19dentist or used following the physician's orders or written 20instructions, (f) supervision or teaching of physical therapy, 21and (g) dry needling in accordance with Section 1.5. "Physical 22therapy" does not include practicing radiology, 23electrosurgery, acupuncture, chiropractic technique or 24providing a determination of a differential diagnosis; 25provided, however, the limitation on determining a 26differential diagnosis shall not in any manner limit a   SB2496 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1physical therapist licensed under this Act from performing an 2evaluation and establishing a physical therapy treatment plan 3pursuant to such license. Nothing in this Section shall limit 4a physical therapist from employing appropriate physical 5therapy techniques that the physical therapist he or she is 6educated and licensed to perform.7    (2) "Physical therapist" means a person who practices 8physical therapy and who has met all requirements as provided 9in this Act.10    (3) "Department" means the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation.12    (4) "Director" means the Director of the Division of 13Professional Regulation of the Department of Financial and 14Professional Regulation with the duties as designated by the 15Secretary.16    (5) "Board" means the Physical Therapy Licensing and 17Disciplinary Board approved by the Secretary Director.18    (6) "Referral" means a written or oral authorization for 19physical therapy services for a patient by a physician, 20dentist, advanced practice registered nurse, physician 21assistant, or podiatric physician who maintains medical 22supervision of the patient and makes a diagnosis or verifies 23that the patient's condition is such that it may be treated by 24a physical therapist.25    (7) (Blank).26    (8) "State" includes:  SB2496 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1        (a) the states of the United States of America;2        (b) the District of Columbia; and3        (c) the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.4    (9) "Physical therapist assistant" means a person licensed 5to assist a physical therapist and who has met all 6requirements as provided in this Act and who works under the 7supervision of a licensed physical therapist to assist in 8implementing the physical therapy treatment program as 9established by the licensed physical therapist. The patient 10care activities provided by the physical therapist assistant 11shall not include the interpretation of referrals, evaluation 12procedures, or the planning or major modification of patient 13programs.14    (10) "Physical therapy aide" means a person who has 15received on the job training, specific to the facility in 16which he is employed.17    (11) (Blank). "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a 18person licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under 19the Nurse Practice Act.20    (12) (Blank). "Physician assistant" means a person 21licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 22    (13) "Health care professional" means a physician, 23dentist, podiatric physician, advanced practice registered 24nurse, or physician assistant. 25    (14) "Address of record" means a designated address 26recorded by the Department in the applicant's application file   SB2496 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1or the licensee's license file as maintained by the 2Department's licensure maintenance unit. 3    (15) "Email address of record" means a designated email 4address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 5application file or the licensee's license file as maintained 6by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 7    (16) "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 8Professional Regulation. 9(Source: P.A. 102-307, eff. 1-1-22.) 10    (225 ILCS 90/1.1 new)11    Sec. 1.1. Address of record; email address of record. All 12applicants and licensees shall:13        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 14    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 15    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 16    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and17        (2) inform the Department of any change to the address 18    of record or the email address of record within 14 days 19    after such change either through the Department's website 20    or by contacting the Department's licensure maintenance 21    unit. 22    (225 ILCS 90/1.2)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 1.2. Physical therapy services.  SB2496 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (a) A physical therapist may provide physical therapy 2services to a patient with or without a referral from a health 3care professional.4    (b) A physical therapist providing services without a 5referral from a health care professional must notify the 6patient's treating health care professional within 5 business 7days after the patient's first visit that the patient is 8receiving physical therapy. This does not apply to physical 9therapy services related to fitness or wellness, unless the 10patient presents with an ailment or injury.11     (b-5) A physical therapist providing services to a 12patient without a referral who has been diagnosed by a health 13care professional as having a chronic disease that may benefit 14from physical therapy must communicate at least monthly with 15the patient's treating health care professional to provide 16updates on the patient's course of therapy.17    (b-10) A physical therapist providing services to a 18patient with a referral who has been diagnosed by a health care 19professional as having a chronic disease must communicate at 20least monthly with the patient's referring health care 21professional consistent with the plan of care established with 22the referring health care professional. 23    (c) A physical therapist shall refer a patient to the 24patient's treating health care professional of record or, in 25the case where there is no health care professional of record, 26to a health care professional of the patient's choice, if:  SB2496 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1        (1) the patient does not demonstrate measurable or 2    functional improvement after 10 visits or 15 business 3    days, whichever occurs first, and continued improvement 4    thereafter;5        (2) the patient was under the care of a physical 6    therapist without a diagnosis established by a health care 7    professional of a chronic disease that may benefit from 8    physical therapy and returns for services for the same or 9    similar condition after 30 calendar days of being 10    discharged by the physical therapist; or11        (3) the patient's condition, at the time of evaluation 12    or services, is determined to be beyond the scope of 13    practice of the physical therapist.14    (d) Wound debridement services may only be provided by a 15physical therapist with written authorization from a health 16care professional.17    (e) A physical therapist shall promptly consult and 18collaborate with the appropriate health care professional 19anytime a patient's condition indicates that it may be related 20to temporomandibular disorder so that a diagnosis can be made 21by that health care professional for an appropriate treatment 22plan. 23(Source: P.A. 102-307, eff. 1-1-22.) 24    (225 ILCS 90/1.5)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2496 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    Sec. 1.5. Dry needling.2    (a) For the purpose of this Act, "dry needling", also 3known as intramuscular manual therapy, means an advanced 4needling skill or technique limited to the treatment of 5myofascial pain, using a single use, single insertion, sterile 6filiform needle (without the use of heat, cold, or any other 7added modality or medication), that is inserted into the skin 8or underlying tissues to stimulate trigger points. Dry 9needling may apply theory based only upon Western medical 10concepts, requires an examination and diagnosis, and treats 11specific anatomic entities selected according to physical 12signs. Dry needling does not include the teaching or 13application of acupuncture described by the stimulation of 14auricular points, utilization of distal points or non-local 15points, needle retention, application of retained electric 16stimulation leads, or other acupuncture theory. 17    (b) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 18licensed under this Act may only perform dry needling after 19completion of requirements, as determined by the Department by 20rule, that meet or exceed the following: (1) 50 hours of 21instructional courses that include, but are not limited to, 22studies in the musculoskeletal and neuromuscular system, the 23anatomical basis of pain mechanisms, chronic and referred 24pain, myofascial trigger point theory, and universal 25precautions; (2) completion of at least 30 hours of didactic 26course work specific to dry needling; (3) successful   SB2496 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1completion of at least 54 practicum hours in dry needling 2course work; (4) completion of at least 200 supervised patient 3treatment sessions; and (5) successful completion of a 4competency examination. Dry needling shall only be performed 5by a licensed physical therapist or licensed physical 6therapist assistant. 7    (c) (Blank).8    (d) (Blank).9    (e) (Blank). 10(Source: P.A. 102-307, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    (225 ILCS 90/2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4252)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 2. Licensure requirement; exempt activities. Practice 14without a license forbidden - exception. No person shall after 15the date of August 31, 1965 begin to practice physical therapy 16in this State or hold oneself himself out as being able to 17practice this profession, unless the person he is licensed as 18such in accordance with the provisions of this Act. After July 191, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 86-1396) this 20amendatory Act of 1990, no person shall practice or hold 21oneself himself out as a physical therapist assistant unless 22the person he is licensed as such under this Act. A physical 23therapist shall use the initials "PT" in connection with the 24physical therapist's his or her name to denote licensure under 25this Act, and a physical therapist assistant shall use the   SB2496 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1initials "PTA" in connection with the physical therapist 2assistant's his or her name to denote licensure under this 3Act. 4    This Act does not prohibit: 5        (1) Any person licensed in this State under any other 6    Act from engaging in the practice for which the person he 7    is licensed. 8        (2) The practice of physical therapy by those persons, 9    practicing under the supervision of a licensed physical 10    therapist and who have met all of the qualifications as 11    provided in Sections 7, 8.1, and 9 of this Act, until the 12    next examination is given for physical therapists or 13    physical therapist assistants and the results have been 14    received by the Department and the Department has 15    determined the applicant's eligibility for a license. 16    Anyone failing to pass said examination shall not again 17    practice physical therapy until such time as an 18    examination has been successfully passed by such person. 19        (3) The practice of physical therapy for a period not 20    exceeding 6 months by a person who is in this State on a 21    temporary basis to assist in a case of medical emergency 22    or to engage in a special physical therapy project, and 23    who meets the qualifications for a physical therapist as 24    set forth in Sections 7 and 8 of this Act and is licensed 25    in another state as a physical therapist. 26        (4) Practice of physical therapy by qualified persons   SB2496 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    who have filed for endorsement for no longer than one year 2    or until such time that notification of licensure has been 3    granted or denied, whichever period of time is lesser. 4        (5) One or more licensed physical therapists from 5    forming a professional service corporation under the 6    provisions of the "Professional Service Corporation Act", 7    approved September 15, 1969, as now or hereafter amended, 8    and licensing such corporation for the practice of 9    physical therapy. 10        (6) Physical therapy aides from performing patient 11    care activities under the on-site supervision of a 12    licensed physical therapist or licensed physical therapist 13    assistant. These patient care activities shall not include 14    interpretation of referrals, evaluation procedures, the 15    planning of or major modifications of, patient programs. 16        (7) Physical therapist assistants Therapist Assistants 17    from performing patient care activities under the general 18    supervision of a licensed physical therapist. The physical 19    therapist must maintain continual contact with the 20    physical therapist assistant including periodic personal 21    supervision and instruction to ensure insure the safety 22    and welfare of the patient. 23        (8) The practice of physical therapy by a physical 24    therapy student or a physical therapist assistant student 25    under the on-site supervision of a licensed physical 26    therapist. The physical therapist shall be readily   SB2496 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    available for direct supervision and instruction to ensure 2    insure the safety and welfare of the patient. 3        (9) The practice of physical therapy as part of an 4    educational program by a physical therapist licensed in 5    another state or country for a period not to exceed 6 6    months.7        (10) (Blank). The practice, services, or activities of 8    persons practicing the specified occupations set forth in 9    subsection (a) of, and pursuant to a licensing exemption 10    granted in subsection (b) or (d) of, Section 2105-350 of 11    the Department of Professional Regulation Law of the Civil 12    Administrative Code of Illinois, but only for so long as 13    the 2016 Olympic and Paralympic Games Professional 14    Licensure Exemption Law is operable. 15(Source: P.A. 96-7, eff. 4-3-09; revised 8-6-24.) 16    (225 ILCS 90/3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4253)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 3. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject to 19the provisions of this Act, the Department shall:20    1. Prescribe rules defining what constitutes a curriculum 21for physical therapy that is reputable and in good standing.22    2. Adopt rules providing for the establishment of a 23uniform and reasonable standard of instruction and maintenance 24to be observed by all curricula for physical therapy which are 25approved by the Department; and determine the reputability and   SB2496 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1good standing of such curricula for physical therapy by 2reference to compliance with such rules, provided that no 3school of physical therapy that refuses admittance to 4applicants solely on account of race, color, creed, sex or 5national origin shall be considered reputable and in good 6standing.7    3. Prescribe and publish rules for a method of examination 8of candidates for licensed physical therapists and licensed 9physical therapist assistants and for issuance of licenses 10authorizing candidates upon passing examination to practice as 11licensed physical therapists and licensed physical therapist 12assistants.13    4. Review application to ascertain the qualifications of 14applicants for licenses.15    5. Authorize examinations to ascertain the qualifications 16of those applicants who require such examinations as a 17component of a license.18    6. Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 19licenses and to discipline persons who are licensed under this 20Act and refuse to issue such licenses, and to discipline such 21licensees, or to refuse to issue a license to any person who 22has practiced physical therapy in violation of this Act, prior 23to applying for a license.24    7. Formulate rules required for the administration of this 25Act.26    8. (Blank). Maintain a list of licensed physical   SB2496 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1therapists and licensed physical therapist assistants 2authorized to practice in the State. This list shall show the 3name of every licensee, his last known place of residence and 4the date and number of his or her license. Any interested 5person in the State may obtain a copy of that list on 6application to the Department and payment of the required fee.7    9. Exercise the powers and duties prescribed by the Civil 8Administrative Code of Illinois for the administration of 9licensing Acts.10(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 11    (225 ILCS 90/4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4254)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 4. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 14Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is hereby expressly 15adopted and incorporated herein as if all of the provisions of 16that Act were included in this Act, except that the provision 17of subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act that provides that at hearings 19the licensee has the right to show compliance with all lawful 20requirements for retention, or continuation, or renewal of the 21license is specifically excluded. For the purposes of this Act 22the notice required under Section 10-25 of the Administrative 23Procedure Act is deemed sufficient when mailed or emailed to 24the last known address of a party.25(Source: P.A. 88-45.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (225 ILCS 90/6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4256)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 6. Duties and functions of the Secretary Director and 4Board. The Secretary Director shall appoint a Physical Therapy 5Licensing and Disciplinary Board as follows: Seven persons who 6shall be appointed by and shall serve in an advisory capacity 7to the Secretary Director. Six members must be actively 8engaged in the practice of physical therapy in this State for a 9minimum of 5 years and one member must be a member of the 10public who is not licensed under this Act, or a similar Act of 11another jurisdiction.12    Members shall serve 4-year 4 year terms and until their 13successors are appointed and qualified. No member shall be 14reappointed to the Board for a term which would cause his 15continuous service on the Board to be longer than 9 successive 16years. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the 17same manner as original appointments, for the unexpired 18portion of the vacated term.19    For the initial appointment of the Board, the Secretary 20Director shall give priority to filling the public member 21terms as vacancies become available.22    Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 23action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 24activities performed in good faith as members of the Board.25    A vacancy in the membership of the Board shall not impair   SB2496 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform 2all the duties of the Board.3    The members of the Board are entitled to receive as 4compensation a reasonable sum as determined by the Secretary 5Director for each day actually engaged in the duties of the 6office and all legitimate and necessary expenses incurred in 7attending the meetings of the Board.8    The membership of the Board should reasonably reflect 9representation from the geographic areas in this State.10    The Secretary Director may terminate the appointment of 11any member for cause which in the opinion of the Secretary 12Director reasonably justifies such termination.13    The Secretary Director shall consider the recommendations 14of the Board on questions involving standards of professional 15conduct, discipline and qualifications of candidates and 16licensees under this Act.17    Nothing shall limit the ability of the Board to provide 18recommendations to the Secretary Director in regard to any 19matter affecting the administration of this Act. The Secretary 20Director shall give due consideration to all recommendations 21of the Board. If the Director takes action contrary to a 22recommendation of the Board, the Director shall promptly 23provide a written explanation of that action.24(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 25    (225 ILCS 90/8)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4258)  SB2496 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 8. Qualifications for licensure as a physical 3therapist. 4    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as a 5physical therapist if that person has applied in writing, on 6forms prescribed by the Department, has paid the required 7fees, and meets all of the following requirements:8        (1) The person He or she is at least 21 years of age 9    and of good moral character. In determining moral 10    character, the Department may take into consideration any 11    felony conviction of the applicant, but such a conviction 12    shall not operate automatically as a complete bar to a 13    license.14        (2) The person He or she has graduated from a 15    curriculum in physical therapy approved by the Department. 16    In approving a curriculum in physical therapy, the 17    Department shall consider, but not be bound by, 18    accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation in 19    Physical Therapy Education. A person who graduated from a 20    physical therapy program outside the United States or its 21    territories shall have the person's his or her degree 22    validated as equivalent to a physical therapy degree 23    conferred by a regionally accredited college or university 24    in the United States. The Department may establish by rule 25    a method for the completion of course deficiencies.26        (3) The person He or she has passed an examination   SB2496 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    approved by the Department to determine the person's his 2    fitness for practice as a physical therapist, or is 3    entitled to be licensed without examination as provided in 4    Sections 10 and 11 of this Act. A person who graduated from 5    a physical therapy program outside the United States or 6    its territories and whose first language is not English 7    shall submit certification of passage of the Test of 8    English as a Foreign Language (TOEFL) and the Test of 9    Spoken English (TSE) as defined by rule prior to taking 10    the licensure examination.11    (b) The Department reserves the right and may request a 12personal interview of an applicant before the Board to further 13evaluate the applicant's his or her qualifications for a 14license.15(Source: P.A. 99-229, eff. 8-3-15.) 16    (225 ILCS 90/8.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4258.1)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 8.1. Qualifications for licensure as a physical 19therapist assistant. A person is qualified to receive a 20license as a physical therapist assistant if that person has 21applied in writing, on forms prescribed by the Department, has 22paid the required fees and: 23        (1) Is at least 18 years of age and of good moral 24    character. In determining moral character, the Department 25    may take into consideration any felony conviction of the   SB2496 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    applicant, but such a conviction shall not operate 2    automatically as a complete bar to a license; 3        (2) Has graduated from a physical therapist assistant 4    program approved by the Department and attained, at a 5    minimum, an associate's degree from the program. In 6    approving such a physical therapist assistant program the 7    Department shall consider but not be bound by 8    accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation in 9    Physical Therapy Education. Any person who graduated from 10    a physical therapist assistant program outside the United 11    States or its territories shall have the person's his or 12    her degree validated as equivalent to a physical therapy 13    assistant degree conferred by a regionally accredited 14    college or university in the United States. The Department 15    may establish by rule a method for the completion of 16    course deficiencies; and 17        (3) Has successfully completed the examination 18    authorized by the Department. A person who graduated from 19    a physical therapist assistant program outside the United 20    States or its territories and whose first language is not 21    English shall submit certification of passage of the Test 22    of English as a Foreign Language (TOEFL) and the Test of 23    Spoken English (TSE) as defined by rule prior to taking 24    the licensure examination.25(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (225 ILCS 90/8.5)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 8.5. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 4Identification Number on license application. In addition to 5any other information required to be contained in the 6application, every application for an original license under 7this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 8or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 9retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As 10soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 11identification number to each applicant for a license.12    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 13require the applicant's customer identification number. 14(Source: P.A. 97-400, eff. 1-1-12.) 15    (225 ILCS 90/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4261)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 11. Endorsement. The Department may, without 18examination, grant a license under this Act to an applicant 19who is licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist 20assistant, without examination, on payment of the required 21fee, an applicant for a license who is a physical therapist or 22physical therapist assistant, as the case may be, licensed 23under the laws of another jurisdiction upon filing of an 24application on forms provided by the Department, paying the 25required fee, and meeting such requirements as are established   SB2496 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1by rule. The Department may adopt rules governing recognition 2of education and legal practice in another jurisdiction, 3requiring additional education, and determining when an 4examination may be required.5    An applicant for endorsement who has practiced for 10 6consecutive years in another jurisdiction shall meet the 7requirements for licensure by endorsement upon filing an 8application on forms provided by the Department, paying the 9required fee, and showing proof of licensure in another 10jurisdiction for at least 10 consecutive years without 11discipline by certified verification of licensure from the 12jurisdiction in which the applicant practiced.13    The Department may waive the English proficiency 14examination by rule.15    Applicants have 3 years from the date of application to 16complete the application process. If the process has not been 17completed in 3 years, the application shall be denied, the fee 18forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and meet the 19requirements in effect at the time of reapplication.20(Source: P.A. 100-893, eff. 8-14-18.) 21    (225 ILCS 90/12)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4262)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 12. Examinations. The Department shall examine 24applicants for licenses as physical therapists or physical 25therapist assistants at such times and places as it may   SB2496 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1determine. At least 2 written examinations shall be given 2during each calendar year for both physical therapists and 3physical therapist assistants. The examination shall be 4approved by the Department.5    Following notification of eligibility for examination, an 6applicant who fails to take the examination for a license 7under this Act within 60 days of the notification or on the 8next available exam date, if no exam is held within 60 days of 9the notification, shall forfeit the his or her fee and the his 10or her right to practice as a physical therapist or physical 11therapist assistant until such time as the applicant has 12passed the appropriate examination. Any applicant failing the 13examination 3 three times in any jurisdiction will not be 14allowed to sit for another examination until the applicant has 15presented satisfactory evidence to the Board of appropriate 16remedial work as set forth in the rules and regulations.17    If an applicant neglects, fails or refuses to take an 18examination or fails to pass an examination for a license or 19otherwise fails to complete the application process under this 20Act within 3 years after filing an his application, the 21application shall be denied. However, such applicant may make 22a new application for examination accompanied by the required 23fee, and must furnish proof of meeting qualifications for 24examination in effect at the time of new application.25(Source: P.A. 99-229, eff. 8-3-15.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (225 ILCS 90/15)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4265)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 15. Restoration of expired licenses. A physical 4therapist or physical therapist assistant who has permitted 5the physical therapist's or physical therapist assistant's his 6or her license to expire or who has had the his or her license 7on inactive status may have the his or her license restored by 8making application to the Department and filing proof 9acceptable to the Department of the licensee's his or her 10fitness to have the his or her license restored, including 11sworn evidence certifying to active practice in another 12jurisdiction satisfactory to the Department and by paying the 13required restoration fee.14    If the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 15has not maintained an active practice in another jurisdiction 16satisfactory to the Department, the Board shall determine, by 17an evaluation program established by rule the licensee's his 18or her fitness to resume active status and may require the 19physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to complete 20a period of evaluated clinical experience and may require 21successful completion of an examination.22    Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 23whose license has been expired or placed on inactive status 24for more than 5 years may have the his or her license restored 25by making application to the Department and filing proof 26acceptable to the Department of the physical therapist's or   SB2496 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1physical therapist assistant's his or her fitness to have the 2his or her license restored, including sworn evidence 3certifying to active practice in another jurisdiction and by 4paying the required restoration fee.5    However, any physical therapist or physical therapist 6assistant whose license has expired while the licensee he has 7been engaged (1) in the federal service in active duty with the 8Army of the United States, the United States Navy, the Marine 9Corps, the Air Force, the Coast Guard, or the State Militia 10called into the service or training of the United States of 11America, or (2) in training or education under the supervision 12of the United States preliminary to induction into the 13military service, may have the his license restored without 14paying any lapsed renewal fees or restoration fee, if, within 152 years after termination of such service, training, or 16education, other than by dishonorable discharge, he furnishes 17the Department is furnished with an affidavit to the effect 18that the physical therapist's or physical therapist assistant 19he has been so engaged and that the physical therapist's or 20physical therapist assistant's his service, training, or 21education has been so terminated.22(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 23    (225 ILCS 90/16)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4266)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)25    Sec. 16. Inactive Licenses. Any physical therapist or   SB2496 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1physical therapist assistant who notifies the Department in 2writing on forms prescribed by the Department, may elect to 3place the physical therapist's or physical therapist 4assistant's his or her license on an inactive status and 5shall, subject to rules of the Department, be excused from 6payment of renewal fees until the physical therapist or 7physical therapist assistant he or she notifies the Department 8in writing of the his or her desire to resume active status.9    Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 10requesting restoration from inactive status shall be required 11to pay the current renewal fee and shall be required to restore 12the his or her license, as provided in Section 15 of this Act.13    Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 14whose license is in an inactive status shall not practice 15physical therapy in the State or present oneself as a physical 16therapist or physical therapist assistant as of Illinois and 17that practice shall be deemed unlicensed practice.18(Source: P.A. 89-387, eff. 1-1-96.) 19    (225 ILCS 90/16.1)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 16.1. Fees; returned checks. The Department shall 22provide by rule a schedule of fees for the administration and 23enforcement of this Act, including, but not limited to, 24original licensure and , renewal, and restoration of a license 25issued under this Act, shall be set by the Department by rule.   SB2496 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1The fees shall be nonrefundable.2    Any person who delivers a check or other payment to the 3Department that is returned to the Department unpaid by the 4financial institution upon which it is drawn shall pay to the 5Department, in addition to the amount already owed, a fine of 6$50. The fines imposed by this Section are in addition to any 7other discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed 8practice or practice on an nonrenewed license. The Department 9shall notify the person that fees and fines shall be paid to 10the Department by certified check or money order within 30 11calendar days after the notification. If, after the expiration 12of 30 days from the date of the notification, the person has 13failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 14shall automatically terminate the license or certificate or 15deny the application without a hearing. If, after termination 16or denial, the person seeks a license or certificate, the 17person shall apply to the Department for the restoration or 18issuance of the license or certificate and pay the required 19fees and fines to the Department. The Department may establish 20a fee for the processing of an application for the restoration 21of a license or certificate to recover all expenses of 22processing the application. The Secretary may waive the fines 23due under this Section in individual cases where the Secretary 24finds that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 25burdensome. 26(Source: P.A. 91-454, eff. 1-1-00.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (225 ILCS 90/17)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4267)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 17. (1) The Department may refuse to issue or to 4renew, or may revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, 5or take other disciplinary action as the Department deems 6appropriate, including the issuance of fines not to exceed 7$5000, with regard to a license for any one or a combination of 8the following:9        A. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 10    the Department or otherwise making misleading, deceptive, 11    untrue, or fraudulent representations in violation of this 12    Act or otherwise in the practice of the profession;13        B. Violations of this Act, or of the rules or 14    regulations promulgated hereunder;15        C. Conviction of any crime under the laws of the 16    United States or any state or territory thereof which is a 17    felony or which is a misdemeanor, an essential element of 18    which is dishonesty, or of any crime which is directly 19    related to the practice of the profession; conviction, as 20    used in this paragraph, shall include a finding or verdict 21    of guilty, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo 22    contendere;23        D. Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 24    obtaining licenses, or violating any provision of this Act 25    or the rules promulgated thereunder pertaining to   SB2496 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    advertising;2        E. A pattern of practice or other behavior which 3    demonstrates incapacity or incompetency to practice under 4    this Act;5        F. Aiding or assisting another person in violating any 6    provision of this Act or Rules;7        G. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 8    response to a written request made by the Department;9        H. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or 10    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 11    defraud or harm the public. Unprofessional conduct shall 12    include any departure from or the failure to conform to 13    the minimal standards of acceptable and prevailing 14    physical therapy practice, in which proceeding actual 15    injury to a patient need not be established;16        I. Unlawful distribution of any drug or narcotic, or 17    unlawful conversion of any drug or narcotic not belonging 18    to the person for such person's own use or benefit or for 19    other than medically accepted therapeutic purposes;20        J. Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 21    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug 22    which results in a physical therapist's or physical 23    therapist assistant's inability to practice with 24    reasonable judgment, skill or safety;25        K. Revocation or suspension of a license to practice 26    physical therapy as a physical therapist or physical   SB2496 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    therapist assistant or the taking of other disciplinary 2    action by the proper licensing authority of another state, 3    territory or country;4        L. Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving from 5    any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association 6    any fee, commission, rebate or other form of compensation 7    for any professional services not actually or personally 8    rendered. Nothing contained in this paragraph prohibits 9    persons holding valid and current licenses under this Act 10    from practicing physical therapy in partnership under a 11    partnership agreement, including a limited liability 12    partnership, a limited liability company, or a corporation 13    under the Professional Service Corporation Act or from 14    pooling, sharing, dividing, or apportioning the fees and 15    monies received by them or by the partnership, company, or 16    corporation in accordance with the partnership agreement 17    or the policies of the company or professional 18    corporation. Nothing in this paragraph (L) affects any 19    bona fide independent contractor or employment 20    arrangements among health care professionals, health 21    facilities, health care providers, or other entities, 22    except as otherwise prohibited by law. Any employment 23    arrangements may include provisions for compensation, 24    health insurance, pension, or other employment benefits 25    for the provision of services within the scope of the 26    licensee's practice under this Act. Nothing in this   SB2496 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    paragraph (L) shall be construed to require an employment 2    arrangement to receive professional fees for services 3    rendered;4        M. A finding by the Board that the licensee after 5    having the his or her license placed on probationary 6    status has violated the terms of probation;7        N. Abandonment of a patient;8        O. Willfully failing to report an instance of 9    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 10    and Neglected Child Reporting Act;11        P. Willfully failing to report an instance of 12    suspected elder abuse or neglect as required by the Elder 13    Abuse Reporting Act;14        Q. Physical illness, including but not limited to, 15    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 16    skill which results in the inability to practice the 17    profession with reasonable judgement, skill or safety;18        R. The use of any words (such as physical therapy, 19    physical therapist physiotherapy or physiotherapist), 20    abbreviations, figures or letters with the intention of 21    indicating practice as a licensed physical therapist 22    without a valid license as a physical therapist issued 23    under this Act;24        S. The use of the term physical therapist assistant, 25    or abbreviations, figures, or letters with the intention 26    of indicating practice as a physical therapist assistant   SB2496 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    without a valid license as a physical therapist assistant 2    issued under this Act;3        T. Willfully violating or knowingly assisting in the 4    violation of any law of this State relating to the 5    practice of abortion;6        U. Continued practice by a person knowingly having an 7    infectious, communicable or contagious disease;8        V. Having treated ailments of human beings otherwise 9    than by the practice of physical therapy as defined in 10    this Act, or having treated ailments of human beings as a 11    licensed physical therapist in violation of Section 1.2;12        W. Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated report 13    by the Department of Children and Family Services pursuant 14    to the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and upon 15    proof by clear and convincing evidence that the licensee 16    has caused a child to be an abused child or neglected child 17    as defined in the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 18    Act;19        X. Interpretation of referrals, performance of 20    evaluation procedures, planning or making major 21    modifications of patient programs by a physical therapist 22    assistant;23        Y. Failure by a physical therapist assistant and 24    supervising physical therapist to maintain continued 25    contact, including periodic personal supervision and 26    instruction, to ensure the insure safety and welfare of   SB2496 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    patients;2        Z. Violation of the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 3    Act.4    (2) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 5is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 6provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 7Code operates as an automatic suspension. Such suspension will 8end only upon a finding by a court that the patient is no 9longer subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission 10and the issuance of an order so finding and discharging the 11patient; and upon the recommendation of the Board to the 12Secretary Director that the licensee be allowed to resume 13practicing his practice.14    (3) The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 15license of any person who fails to file a return, or to pay the 16tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 17final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as required by 18any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 19Revenue, until such time as the requirements of any such tax 20Act are satisfied.21(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-897, eff. 8-16-18.) 22    (225 ILCS 90/18)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4268)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 18. Violations; injunction; cease and desist order. 25Violations - Injunction - Cease and Desist Order.   SB2496 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (a) If any person violates the provision of this Act, the 2Secretary Director may, in the name of the People of the State 3of Illinois, through the Attorney General of the State of 4Illinois, or the State's Attorney in the county in which the 5offense occurs, petition for an order enjoining such violation 6or for an order enforcing compliance with this Act. Upon the 7filing of a verified petition in such court, the court may 8issue a temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, 9and may preliminarily and permanently enjoin such violation. 10If it is established that such person has violated or is 11violating the injunction, the Court may punish the offender 12for contempt of court. Proceedings under this Section shall be 13in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other remedies and 14penalties provided by this Act.15    (b) If any person shall practice as a physical therapist 16or physical therapist assistant or hold oneself himself out as 17a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant without 18being licensed under the provisions of this Act, then any 19licensed physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, 20any interested party, or any person injured thereby may, in 21addition to the Secretary Director, petition for relief as 22provided in subsection (a) of this Section or may apply to the 23Circuit Court of the county in which such violation or some 24part thereof occurred, or in which the person complained of 25has a his principal place of business or resides, to prevent 26such violation. The court has jurisdiction to enforce   SB2496 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1obedience by injunction or by other process restricting such 2person complained of from further violation and enjoining upon 3the person him obedience.4    (c) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, any person 5violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 6rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 7be entered against the person him. The rule shall clearly set 8forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall 9provide a period of 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 10answer to the satisfaction of the Department. Failure to 11answer to the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an 12order to cease and desist to be issued immediately.13(Source: P.A. 86-1396.) 14    (225 ILCS 90/19)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4269)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 19. Investigations; notice and hearing. The 17Department may investigate the actions of any applicant or of 18any person or persons holding or claiming to hold a license. 19The Department shall, before refusing to issue, to renew or 20discipline a license pursuant to Section 17, at least 30 days 21prior to the date set for the hearing, notify in writing the 22applicant for, or holder of, a license of the nature of the 23charges, that a hearing will be held on the date designated, 24and direct the applicant or licensee to file a written answer 25to the Board under oath within 20 days after the service of the   SB2496 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1notice and inform the applicant or licensee that failure to 2file an answer will result in default being taken against the 3applicant or licensee and that the license or certificate may 4be suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or other 5disciplinary action may be taken, including limiting the 6scope, nature or extent of practice, as the Secretary Director 7may deem proper. Written notice may be served by personal 8delivery or by certified or registered mail to the 9respondent's respondent at the address of his last 10notification to the Department or the licensee's email address 11of record. In case the person fails to file an answer after 12receiving notice, the his or her license or certificate may, 13in the discretion of the Department, be suspended, revoked, or 14placed on probationary status, or the Department may take 15whatever disciplinary action deemed proper, including limiting 16the scope, nature, or extent of the person's practice or the 17imposition of a fine, without a hearing, if the act or acts 18charged constitute sufficient grounds for such action under 19this Act. At the time and place fixed in the notice, the Board 20shall proceed to hear the charges and the parties or their 21counsel shall be accorded ample opportunity to present such 22statements, testimony, evidence and argument as may be 23pertinent to the charges or to their defense. The Board may 24continue a hearing from time to time.25(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.)   SB2496 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    (225 ILCS 90/19.5)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 19.5. Confidentiality. All information collected by 4the Department in the course of an examination or 5investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 6limited to, any complaint against a licensee filed with the 7Department and information collected to investigate any such 8complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 9Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department may not 10disclose the information to anyone other than law enforcement 11officials, other regulatory agencies that have an appropriate 12regulatory interest as determined by the Secretary of the 13Department, or a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the 14Department. Information and documents disclosed to a federal, 15State, county, or local law enforcement agency or regulatory 16agency shall not be disclosed by the agency for any purpose to 17any other agency or person. A formal complaint filed by the 18Department against a licensee or applicant shall be a public 19record, except as otherwise prohibited by law.20(Source: P.A. 99-229, eff. 8-3-15.) 21    (225 ILCS 90/22)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4272)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 22. Findings of the Board and Recommendations. At the 24conclusion of the hearing, the Board shall present to the 25Secretary Director a written report of its findings and   SB2496 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1recommendations. The report shall contain a finding whether or 2not the accused person violated this Act or failed to comply 3with the conditions required in this Act. The Board shall 4specify the nature of the violation or failure to comply, and 5shall make its recommendations to the Secretary Director.6    The report of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and 7recommendations of the Board shall be the basis for the 8Secretary's Department's order or refusal or for the granting 9of a license or permit unless the Secretary determines 10Director shall determine that the Board report is contrary to 11the manifest weight of the evidence, in which case the 12Secretary Director may issue an order in contravention of the 13Board report. The finding is not admissible in evidence 14against the person in a criminal prosecution brought for the 15violation of this Act, but the hearing and finding are not a 16bar to a criminal prosecution brought for the violation of 17this Act.18(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 19    (225 ILCS 90/23)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4273)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 23. Report of the Board; motion for rehearing 22Rehearing. In any case involving the refusal to issue or , 23renew a license or the taking of disciplinary action against 24discipline of a license, a copy of the Board's report shall be 25served upon the respondent by the Department, either   SB2496 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1personally or by mail to the respondent's address of record or 2email address of record or as provided in this Act for the 3service of the notice of hearing. Within 20 days after such 4service, the respondent may present to the Secretary 5Department a motion in writing for a rehearing, which motion 6shall specify the particular grounds therefor. If no motion 7for rehearing is filed, then upon the expiration of the time 8specified for filing such a motion, or if a motion for 9rehearing is denied, then upon such denial the Secretary 10Director may enter an order in accordance with recommendations 11of the Board except as provided in Section 22 of this Act. If 12the respondent shall order from the reporting service, and pay 13for a transcript of the record within the time for filing a 14motion for rehearing, the 20-day 20 day period within which 15such a motion may be filed shall commence upon the delivery of 16the transcript to the respondent.17(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 18    (225 ILCS 90/24)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4274)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 24. Rehearing. Director - Rehearing. Upon a finding 21by the Secretary Whenever the Director is satisfied that 22substantial justice has not been done in the revocation, 23suspension, or refusal to issue or renew a license, the 24Secretary Director may order a rehearing by the same or other 25examiners.  SB2496 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1(Source: P.A. 84-595.) 2    (225 ILCS 90/25)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4275)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 25. Appointment of a Hearing Officer. The Secretary 5Director shall have the authority to appoint any attorney duly 6licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois to serve as 7the hearing officer in any action for refusal to issue, renew 8or discipline of a license or permit. The hearing officer 9shall have full authority to conduct the hearing. At least one 10member of the Board shall attend each hearing. The hearing 11officer shall report the hearing officer's his findings and 12recommendations to the Board and the Secretary Director. The 13Board shall have 60 days from receipt of the report to review 14the report of the hearing officer and present their findings 15of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations to the 16Secretary Director. If the Board fails to present its report 17within the 60-day 60 day period, the Secretary Director shall 18issue an order based on the report of the hearing officer. If 19the Secretary Director determines that the Board's report is 20contrary to the manifest weight of the evidence, the Secretary 21he may issue an order in contravention of the Board's report.22(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 23    (225 ILCS 90/25.5 new)24    Sec. 25.5. Certification of record. The Department shall   SB2496 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1not be required to certify any record to a court, file any 2answer in court, or otherwise appear in court in a judicial 3review proceeding, unless the Department has received from the 4plaintiff payment of the costs of furnishing and certifying 5the record. The costs of furnishing and certifying a record 6shall be determined by the Department. Failure on the part of 7the plaintiff to file a receipt in court shall be grounds for 8dismissal of the action. 9    (225 ILCS 90/26)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4276)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 26. Order or certified copy; prima facie proof. An 12order or a certified copy thereof, over the seal of the 13Department and purporting to be signed by the Secretary or 14Director, shall be prima facie proof that: 15        (a) the signature is the genuine signature of the 16    Secretary or Director, respectively; 17        (b) the Secretary or Director, respectively, is duly 18    appointed and qualified; and 19        (c) the Board and the members thereof are qualified to 20    act.21(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 22    (225 ILCS 90/29)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4279)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 29. Temporary Suspension of a License. The Secretary   SB2496 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1Director may temporarily suspend the license of a physical 2therapist or physical therapist assistant without a hearing, 3simultaneously with the institution of proceedings for a 4hearing provided for in Section 19 of this Act, if the 5Secretary Director finds that evidence in his possession 6indicates that a physical therapist's or a physical therapist 7assistant's continuation in practice would constitute an 8imminent danger to the public. In the event that the Secretary 9Director suspends, temporarily, the license of a physical 10therapist or physical therapist assistant without a hearing, a 11hearing by the Board must be held within 30 calendar days after 12such suspension has occurred.13(Source: P.A. 94-651, eff. 1-1-06.) 14    (225 ILCS 90/31)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4281)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 31. Violations. 17    (a) Any person who is found to have violated any provision 18of this Act is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first 19offense and a Class 4 felony for the second and any subsequent 20offense.21    (b) Any person or company representing itself himself or 22herself or advertising as a physical therapist or that the 23services the person or company he or she renders are physical 24therapy, or who uses any words, such as physical therapy, 25physical therapist, physiotherapy, or physiotherapist,   SB2496 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1abbreviations, figures, or letters, such as "PT", "DPT", 2"MPT", "RPT", "LPT", or "PTA", indicating that the person or 3company he or she is engaged in the practice of physical 4therapy when the person or company he or she does not possess a 5currently valid license as defined herein, commits a Class A 6misdemeanor, for a first offense, and a Class 4 felony for a 7second or subsequent offense. 8    (c) Any person representing oneself himself or herself or 9advertising as a physical therapist assistant or that the 10services the person he or she renders are physical therapy, or 11who uses any words, such as physical therapy or physical 12therapist assistant, abbreviations, figures, or letters, such 13as "PT", "DPT", "MPT", "RPT", "LPT", or "PTA", indicating that 14the person he or she is engaged in the practice of physical 15therapy when the person he or she does not possess a currently 16valid license as defined herein, commits a Class A misdemeanor 17for a first offense, and a Class 4 felony for a second or 18subsequent offense.19(Source: P.A. 93-1010, eff. 8-24-04.) 20    (225 ILCS 90/36)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4286)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 36. Home rule; exclusive Exclusive jurisdiction. The 23regulation and licensing of physical therapists and physical 24therapist assistants are exclusive powers and functions of the 25State. A home rule unit may not regulate or license physical   SB2496 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1therapists or physical therapist assistants. This Section is a 2denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 3subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 4Constitution.5(Source: P.A. 85-342; 86-1396.) 6    (225 ILCS 90/32.1 rep.)7    Section 15. The Illinois Physical Therapy Act is amended 8by repealing Section 32.1. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 5 10take effect upon becoming law.  SB2496 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 80/4.364    5 ILCS 80/4.41 new5    225 ILCS 90/0.056    225 ILCS 90/1from Ch. 111, par. 42517    225 ILCS 90/1.1 new8    225 ILCS 90/1.29    225 ILCS 90/1.510    225 ILCS 90/2from Ch. 111, par. 425211    225 ILCS 90/3from Ch. 111, par. 425312    225 ILCS 90/4from Ch. 111, par. 425413    225 ILCS 90/6from Ch. 111, par. 425614    225 ILCS 90/8from Ch. 111, par. 425815    225 ILCS 90/8.1from Ch. 111, par. 4258.116    225 ILCS 90/8.517    225 ILCS 90/11from Ch. 111, par. 426118    225 ILCS 90/12from Ch. 111, par. 426219    225 ILCS 90/15from Ch. 111, par. 426520    225 ILCS 90/16from Ch. 111, par. 426621    225 ILCS 90/16.122    225 ILCS 90/17from Ch. 111, par. 426723    225 ILCS 90/18from Ch. 111, par. 426824    225 ILCS 90/19from Ch. 111, par. 426925    225 ILCS 90/19.5  SB2496 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07529 AAS 17573 b1    225 ILCS 90/22from Ch. 111, par. 42722    225 ILCS 90/23from Ch. 111, par. 42733    225 ILCS 90/24from Ch. 111, par. 42744    225 ILCS 90/25from Ch. 111, par. 42755    225 ILCS 90/25.5 new6    225 ILCS 90/26from Ch. 111, par. 42767    225 ILCS 90/29from Ch. 111, par. 42798    225 ILCS 90/31from Ch. 111, par. 42819    225 ILCS 90/36from Ch. 111, par. 428610    225 ILCS 90/32.1 rep.